Louisiana, session 2026, SB61.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 30:4(C)(17)(c), 1104(F), and 1104.3 are hereby enacted to read as
follows:
§4. Jurisdiction, duties, and powers of the secretary; rules and regulations
* * *
C. The secretary has authority to make, after notice and hearings as provided
Page 1 of 5
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-131 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 61
in this Chapter, any reasonable rules, regulations, and orders that are necessary from
time to time in the proper administration and enforcement of this Chapter, including
rules, regulations, or orders for the following purposes:
* * *
(17)
* * *
(c) The secretary's authority pursuant to this Paragraph shall be subject
to the local option procedures set forth in Chapter 11 of this Subtitle.
* * *
§1104. Duties and powers of the secretary; rules and regulations; permits
* * *
F.(1) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the secretary
shall not issue any order, permit, or certificate authorizing Class VI injection
wells, carbon dioxide sequestration, or pipelines transporting carbon dioxide in
any parish where prohibited pursuant to the local option procedure set forth in
this Chapter.
(2) The prohibition in this Section shall prevent the final issuance of any
order, permit, or certificate, regardless of whether the application was
previously submitted to the department.
* * *
§1104.3. Local option
A. A parish governing authority and the citizens of a parish may
determine whether Class VI injection wells, carbon dioxide sequestration, or
pipelines transporting carbon dioxide are permitted within a particular parish
as provided in this Section.
B.(1) A parish governing authority may, by ordinance, determine
whether or not Class VI injection wells, carbon dioxide sequestration, or
pipelines transporting carbon dioxide may be permitted within the parish.
(2) A copy of any ordinance passed for this purpose shall be provided to
Page 2 of 5
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-131 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 61
the department by the governing authority.
(3) Any prohibition passed by a governing authority pursuant to this
Subsection shall become effective upon its adoption by the parish governing
authority.
C. In addition to the procedure provided in Subsection B of this Section,
a parish-wide election may be held to determine whether or not Class VI
injection wells, carbon dioxide sequestration, or pipelines transporting carbon
dioxide shall be permitted within that parish pursuant to the following
procedures:
(1) A parish governing authority may call an election for this purpose
upon its own initiative and shall call an election for this purpose when requested
to do so by written petition signed by a least fifteen percent of the qualified
electors of the parish, as certified by the parish registrar of voters. Whether
initiated by the parish governing authority or by petition, the election shall be
ordered by a resolution adopted by the parish governing authority that states
the purpose for which the election is being called and the date the election is to
be held.
(2) Any election called pursuant to this Section shall be held in
accordance with the provisions of the Louisiana Election Code governing
proposition or question elections.
(3)(a) If a majority of the electors voting in the election vote to allow
Class VI injection wells, carbon dioxide sequestration, or pipelines transporting
carbon dioxide, then such activity may be permitted within the parish as
provided by law.
(b) If a majority of the electors voting in the election vote not to allow
Class VI injection wells, carbon dioxide sequestration, or pipelines transporting
carbon dioxide, then such activity shall be prohibited within the parish.
(4) The parish governing authority that ordered the election shall
promulgate the results of the election by ordinance adopted at its first regular
Page 3 of 5
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-131 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 61
meeting after the election and shall notify the department of the results.
(5) Elections authorized by this Section shall not be held more than once
in a five-year period.
(6) Any prohibition determined by an election pursuant to this
Subsection shall be effective upon certification of the election results by the
parish registrar of voters.
D. In the event that there are conflicting determinations made by a
parish governing authority adopting an ordinance pursuant to Subsection B of
this Section and the results of an election held pursuant to Subsection C of this
Section, the results of the election shall govern and may not be superseded by
subsequent action taken by the parish governing authority alone until the
expiration of five years from the date of the most recent election held for this
purpose.
E. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, a local
determination made pursuant to this Section shall supersede and preempt any
conflicting state or local law, regulation, order, permit, or certificate. No
application, option agreement, site control agreement, or preliminary or draft
approval shall confer vested rights or grandfathered authority inconsistent with
a parish prohibition adopted pursuant to this Section.
Section 2. If any provision of this Act or the application thereof is held invalid, such
invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of this Act which can be given
effect without the invalid provisions or applications, and to this end the provisions of this
Act are hereby declared severable.
Section 3. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.
Page 4 of 5
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-131 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 61